Georgia, session 2025_26, HB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
practice and procedure relative to state courts of counties, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"15-7-41.1.
Each state court clerk shall be required to publish and maintain information and dates
regarding terms of court in a prominent location on its public website."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 378
- 1 -